Georgia statutes. TITLE 49 Social Services
Article 3 Silver-Haired Legislature

49-6-40.
[Reserved] Creation; membership; meetings, organization, and adoption of measures.

History.

Ga. L. 1980, p. 807; Ga. L. 1997, p. 891, § 1; repealed by Ga. L. 2019, p. 919, § 15-1/HB 553, effective July 1, 2019.

Editor’s notes.

Ga. L. 2019, p. 919, § 15-1/HB 553 repealed and reserved this article, effective July 1, 2019.

Ga. L. 2019, p. 919, § 15-2/HB 553, not codified by the General Assembly, provides: “Any assets of the Georgia Silver-Haired Legislature existing as of June 30, 2019, shall devolve by operation of law and without further action to the State of Georgia on July 1, 2019. Any liabilities and obligations of the Georgia Silver-Haired Legislature existing as of June 30, 2019, shall be transferred to and assumed by the State of Georgia, by such instruments as may be required to maintain the same.”